California, session 20252026, AB477.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Fair Pay for Educators Act.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 2574 of the Education Code is amended to read:2574. For the 2013–14 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent annually shall calculate a county local control funding formula for each county superintendent of schools as follows:(a) Compute a county office of education operations grant equal to the sum of each of the following amounts:(1) (A) Six hundred fifty-five thousand nine hundred twenty dollars ($655,920).(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), commencing with the 2036–37 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, one million three hundred eight thousand two hundred twenty-seven dollars ($1,308,227), as adjusted each fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (4).(2) (A) One hundred nine thousand three hundred twenty dollars ($109,320) multiplied by the number of school districts for which the county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction pursuant to Section 1253.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), commencing with the 2036–37 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, five hundred twenty thousand seven hundred fifty-one dollars ($520,751) multiplied by the number of school districts for which the county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction pursuant to Section 1253, as adjusted each fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (4).(3) (A) (i) Seventy dollars ($70) multiplied by the number of units of countywide average daily attendance, up to a maximum of 30,000 units.(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), commencing with the 2036–37 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, one hundred sixty-four dollars ($164) multiplied by the number of units of countywide average daily attendance, up to a maximum of 30,000 units, as adjusted each fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (4).(B) (i) Sixty dollars ($60) multiplied by the number of units of countywide average daily attendance for the portion of countywide average daily attendance, if any, above 30,000 units, up to a maximum of 60,000 units.(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), commencing with the 2036–37 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, one hundred forty-four dollars ($144) multiplied by the number of units of countywide average daily attendance for the portion of countywide average daily attendance, if any, above 30,000 units, up to a maximum of 60,000 units, as adjusted each fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (4).(C) (i) Fifty dollars ($50) multiplied by the number of units of countywide average daily attendance for the portion of countywide average daily attendance, if any, above 60,000 units, up to a maximum of 140,000 units.(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), commencing with the 2036–37 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, one hundred twenty-four dollars ($124) multiplied by the number of units of countywide average daily attendance for the portion of countywide average daily attendance, if any, above 60,000 units, up to a maximum of 140,000 units, as adjusted each fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (4).(D) (i) Forty dollars ($40) multiplied by the number of units of countywide average daily attendance for the portion of countywide average daily attendance, if any, above 140,000 units.(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), commencing with the 2036–37 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, one hundred four dollars ($104) multiplied by the number of units of countywide average daily attendance for the portion of countywide average daily attendance, if any, above 140,000 units, as adjusted each fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (4).(E) For purposes of this section, countywide average daily attendance means the aggregate number of annual units of average daily attendance within the county attributable to all school districts for which the county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction pursuant to Section 1253, charter schools authorized by school districts for which the county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction, and charter schools authorized by the county superintendent of schools.(4) For the 2014–15 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, adjust each of the rates provided in the prior year pursuant to paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) by the percentage change in the annual average value of the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services for the United States, as published by the United States Department of Commerce for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the prior fiscal year. This percentage change shall be determined using the latest data available as of May 10 of the preceding fiscal year compared with the annual average value of the same deflator for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the second preceding fiscal year, using the latest data available as of May 10 of the preceding fiscal year, as reported by the Department of Finance.(5) (A) For the 2022–23 fiscal year to the 2035–36 fiscal year, inclusive, add one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($175,000) to the amount specified in paragraph (2), as that rate was adjusted pursuant to paragraph (4).(B) Commencing with the 2036–37 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, add two hundred sixty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($262,500) to the amount specified in paragraph (2), as that rate was adjusted pursuant to paragraph (4).(6) (A) For the 2022–23 fiscal year to the 2035–36 fiscal year, inclusive, add fourteen dollars ($14) to each of the amounts specified in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (3), as those rates were adjusted pursuant to paragraph (4).(B) Commencing with the 2036–37 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, add twenty-one dollars ($21) to each of the amounts specified in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (3), as those rates were adjusted pursuant to paragraph (4).(b) Determine the enrollment percentage of unduplicated pupils pursuant to the following:(1) (A) For the 2013–14 fiscal year, divide the enrollment of unduplicated pupils in all schools operated by a county superintendent of schools in the 2013–14 fiscal year by the total enrollment in those schools in the 2013–14 fiscal year.(B) For the 2014–15 fiscal year, divide the sum of the enrollment of unduplicated pupils in all schools operated by a county superintendent of schools in the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years by the sum of the total enrollment in those schools in the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years.(C) For the 2015–16 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, divide the sum of the enrollment of unduplicated pupils in all schools operated by a county superintendent of schools in the current fiscal year and the two prior fiscal years by the sum of the total enrollment in those schools in the current fiscal year and the two prior fiscal years.(D) (i) For purposes of the quotients determined pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (C), the Superintendent shall use a county superintendent of schools’ enrollment of unduplicated pupils and total pupil enrollment in the 2014–15 fiscal year instead of the enrollment of unduplicated pupils and total pupil enrollment in the 2013–14 fiscal year if doing so would yield an overall greater percentage of unduplicated pupils.(ii) It is the intent of the Legislature to review each county office of education’s enrollment of unduplicated pupils for the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years and provide one-time funding, if necessary, for a county office of education with higher enrollment of unduplicated pupils in the 2014–15 fiscal year as compared to the 2013–14 fiscal year.(E) For purposes of determining the enrollment percentage of unduplicated pupils pursuant to this subdivision, enrollment in schools or classes established pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 48645) of Chapter 4 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 and the enrollment of pupils other than the pupils identified in clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c), shall be excluded from the calculation of the enrollment percentage of unduplicated pupils.(F) The data used to determine the percentage of unduplicated pupils shall be final once that data is no longer used in the current fiscal year calculation of the percentage of unduplicated pupils. This subparagraph does not apply to a change that is the result of an audit that has been appealed pursuant to Section 41344.(2) For purposes of this section, an “unduplicated pupil” is a pupil who is classified as an English learner, eligible for a free or reduced-price meal, or a foster youth. For purposes of this section, the definitions in Section 42238.01 of an English learner, a pupil eligible for a free or reduced-price meal, and foster youth shall apply. A pupil shall be counted only once for purposes of this section if any of the following apply:(A) The pupil is classified as an English learner and is eligible for a free or reduced-price meal.(B) The pupil is classified as an English learner and is a foster youth.(C) The pupil is eligible for a free or reduced-price meal and is classified as a foster youth.(D) The pupil is classified as an English learner, is eligible for a free or reduced-price meal, and is a foster youth.(3) (A) Under procedures and timeframes established by the Superintendent, commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, a county superintendent of schools annually shall report the enrollment of unduplicated pupils, pupils classified as English learners, pupils eligible for free and reduced-price meals, and foster youth in schools operated by the county superintendent of schools to the Superintendent using the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System.(B) The Superintendent shall make the calculations pursuant to this section using the data submitted through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System.(C) The Controller shall include instructions, as appropriate, in the audit guide required by subdivision (a) of Section 14502.1, for determining if the data reported by a county superintendent of schools using the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System is consistent with pupil data records maintained by the county office of education.(c) Compute an alternative education grant equal to the sum of the following:(1) (A) (i) For the 2013–14 fiscal year to the 2022–23 fiscal year, inclusive, a base grant equal to the 2012–13 per pupil undeficited statewide average juvenile court school base revenue limit calculated pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 2550) of Chapter 12, as that article read on January 1, 2013, and as adjusted each fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (B). For purposes of this subparagraph, the 2012–13 statewide average juvenile court school base revenue limit shall be considered final as of the annual apportionment for the 2012–13 fiscal year, as calculated for purposes of the certification required on or before February 20, 2014, pursuant to Sections 41332 and 41339.(ii) For the 2023–24 fiscal year, a base grant equal to the grade span-adjusted base grant for average daily attendance in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, calculated pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02, for the 2022–23 fiscal year, multiplied by 1.33, and then adjusted pursuant to subparagraph (B) for the 2023–24 fiscal year.(iii) For the 2024–25 fiscal year to the 2035–36 fiscal year, inclusive, a base grant equal to the amount calculated pursuant to clause (ii) and as adjusted each year pursuant to subparagraph (B).(iv) Commencing with the 2036–37 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, a base grant equal to twenty-four thousand five hundred ninety-three dollars ($24,593), as adjusted each fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (B).(B) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, the per pupil base grant shall be adjusted by the percentage change in the annual average value of the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services for the United States, as published by the United States Department of Commerce for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the prior fiscal year. This percentage change shall be determined using the latest data available as of May 10 of the preceding fiscal year compared with the annual average value of the same deflator for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the second preceding fiscal year, using the latest data available as of May 10 of the preceding fiscal year, as reported by the Department of Finance.(2) A supplemental grant equal to 35 percent of the base grant described in paragraph (1) multiplied by the enrollment percentage calculated in subdivision (b). The supplemental grant shall be expended in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42238.07.(3) (A) A concentration grant equal to 35 percent of the base grant described in paragraph (1) multiplied by the greater of either of the following:(i) The enrollment percentage calculated in subdivision (b) less 50 percent.(ii) Zero.(B) The concentration grant shall be expended in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42238.07.(4) (A) Multiply the sum of paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) by the total number of units of average daily attendance for pupils attending schools operated by a county office of education, excluding units of average daily attendance for pupils attending schools or classes established pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 48645) of Chapter 4 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2, who are enrolled pursuant to any of the following:(i) Probation-referred pursuant to Sections 300, 601, 602, and 654 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(ii) On probation or parole and not in attendance in a school.(iii) Expelled for any of the reasons specified in subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 48915.(B) Multiply the number of units of average daily attendance for pupils attending schools or classes established pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 48645) of Chapter 4 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 by the sum of the base grant calculated pursuant to paragraph (1), a supplemental grant equal to 35 percent of the base grant calculated pursuant to paragraph (1), and a concentration grant equal to 17.5 percent of the base grant calculated pursuant to paragraph (1). Funds provided for the supplemental and concentration grants pursuant to this calculation shall be expended in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42238.07.(C) Add the amounts calculated in subparagraphs (A) and (B).(5) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, and for purposes of this subdivision, average daily attendance shall be the sum of both of the following:(A) The average daily attendance reported by the county superintendent of schools for the annual reporting period for the current fiscal year, or the prior fiscal year if the prior year total is greater, or the average of the three most recent prior fiscal years if the average total is greater than both the current year and the prior year.(B) If applicable, the average daily attendance reported by a charter school in the county established pursuant to Section 47605.5 for the annual reporting period for the current fiscal year.(d) Add the amount calculated in subdivision (a) to the amount calculated in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c).(e) Add all of the following to the amount calculated in subdivision (d):(1) The amount of funding a county superintendent of schools received for the 2012–13 fiscal year from funds allocated pursuant to the Targeted Instructional Improvement Block Grant program, as set forth in Article 6 (commencing with Section 41540) of Chapter 3.2 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2, as that article read on January 1, 2013.(2) (A) The amount of funding a county superintendent of schools received for the 2012–13 fiscal year from funds allocated pursuant to the Home-to-School Transportation program, as set forth in former Article 2 (commencing with Section 39820) of Chapter 1 of Part 23.5 of Division 3 of Title 2, former Article 10 (commencing with Section 41850) of Chapter 5 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2, and the Small School District Transportation program, as set forth in former Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 42290) of Chapter 7 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2, as those articles read on January 1, 2013.(B) If a home-to-school transportation joint powers agency, established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for purposes of providing pupil transportation, received an apportionment directly from the Superintendent pursuant to Item 6110-111-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2012, as identified in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2575, the joint powers agency may identify the member local educational agencies and transfer entitlement to that funding to any of those member local educational agencies by reporting to the Superintendent, on or before September 30, 2015, the reassignment of a specified amount of the joint powers agency’s 2012–13 fiscal year entitlement to the member local educational agency. Commencing with the 2015–16 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall add the reassigned amounts to the amounts calculated pursuant to this paragraph.(C) Commencing in the 2023–24 fiscal year, the add-on amounts referenced in subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall receive the annual cost-of-living adjustment specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).(3) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for each county office of education operating at least one juvenile court school pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 48645) of Chapter 4 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2, including a county office of education that authorized a charter school for that purpose pursuant to Section 47605.5.(4) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for each county office of education operating at least one county community school pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 1980), including a county office of education that authorized a charter school for that purpose pursuant to Section 47605.5.(f) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the funds allocated pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (e) be included in the local control and accountability plan template pursuant to Section 52064.(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to fully fund the county office of education local control funding formula target county operations grants and alternative education base grants in those years preceding the 2036–37 fiscal year and to spend those funds in the manner described in subdivision (b) of Section 42238.017.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. Section 42238.017 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 42238.016, to read:42238.017. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish new local control funding formula (LCFF) target grade span-adjusted base grant funding levels for school districts, charter schools, and county offices of education to raise wages by 50 percent, in recognition that the LCFF funding targets established in Assembly Bill 97 of the 2013–14 Regular Session (Chapter 47 of the Statutes of 2013) that were met in the 2018–19 fiscal year did not provide the funding necessary to close the pay gap for educators and schoolsite staff. These aspirational funding levels will continue to support local educational agencies’ efforts to improve recruitment and retention of schoolsite staff and improve educational opportunities for pupils.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to fully fund the LCFF target base grants over 10 years, with full implementation in the 2036–37 fiscal year. It is further the intent of the Legislature to use the funds in order to increase salaries for classified and certificated staff working at schoolsites in school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools to close the wage gap and improve recruitment and retention of school site staff. staff, subject to local bargaining. This legislative intent does not apply to basic aid school districts.(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that sufficient funding be appropriated for the state special schools for the deaf and the blind to enable comparable wage increases as school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. Section 42238.02 of the Education Code is amended to read:42238.02. (a) The amount computed pursuant to this section shall be known as the school district and charter school local control funding formula.(b) (1) For purposes of this section “unduplicated pupil” means a pupil enrolled in a school district or a charter school who is either classified as an English learner, eligible for a free or reduced-price meal, or is a foster youth. A pupil shall be counted only once for purposes of this section if any of the following apply:(A) The pupil is classified as an English learner and is eligible for a free or reduced-price meal.(B) The pupil is classified as an English learner and is a foster youth.(C) The pupil is eligible for a free or reduced-price meal and is classified as a foster youth.(D) The pupil is classified as an English learner, is eligible for a free or reduced-price meal, and is a foster youth.(2) Under procedures and timeframes established by the Superintendent, commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, a school district or charter school shall annually submit its enrolled free and reduced-price meal eligibility, foster youth, and English learner pupil-level records for enrolled pupils to the Superintendent using the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System.(3) (A) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, a county office of education shall review and validate certified aggregate English learner, foster youth, and free or reduced-price meal eligible pupil data for school districts and charter schools under its jurisdiction to ensure the data is reported accurately. The Superintendent shall provide each county office of education with appropriate access to school district and charter school data reports in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System for purposes of ensuring data reporting accuracy.(B) The Controller shall include the instructions necessary to enforce paragraph (2) in the audit guide required by Section 14502.1. The instructions shall include, but are not necessarily limited to, procedures for determining if the English learner, foster youth, and free or reduced-price meal eligible pupil counts are consistent with the school district’s or charter school’s English learner, foster youth, and free or reduced-price meal eligible pupil records.(4) The Superintendent shall make the calculations pursuant to this section using the data submitted by local educational agencies, including charter schools, through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System. Under timeframes and procedures established by the Superintendent, school districts and charter schools may review and revise their submitted data on English learner, foster youth, and free or reduced-price meal eligible pupil counts to ensure the accuracy of data reflected in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System.(5) The Superintendent shall annually compute the percentage of unduplicated pupils for each school district and charter school by dividing the enrollment of unduplicated pupils in a school district or charter school by the total enrollment in that school district or charter school pursuant to all of the following:(A) For the 2013–14 fiscal year, divide the sum of unduplicated pupils for the 2013–14 fiscal year by the sum of the total pupil enrollment for the 2013–14 fiscal year.(B) For the 2014–15 fiscal year, divide the sum of unduplicated pupils for the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years by the sum of the total pupil enrollment for the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years.(C) For the 2015–16 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, divide the sum of unduplicated pupils for the current fiscal year and the two prior fiscal years by the sum of the total pupil enrollment for the current fiscal year and the two prior fiscal years.(D) (i) For purposes of the quotients determined pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (C), the Superintendent shall use a school district’s or charter school’s enrollment of unduplicated pupils and total pupil enrollment in the 2014–15 fiscal year instead of the enrollment of unduplicated pupils and total pupil enrollment in the 2013–14 fiscal year if doing so would yield an overall greater percentage of unduplicated pupils.(ii) It is the intent of the Legislature to review each school district and charter school’s enrollment of unduplicated pupils for the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years and provide one-time funding, if necessary, for a school district or charter school with higher enrollment of unduplicated pupils in the 2014–15 fiscal year as compared to the 2013–14 fiscal year.(E) (i) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of subparagraph (C), the unduplicated pupils and total pupil enrollment in prior fiscal years shall be the following:(I) For a transferred charter school, the counts shall be equal to the counts reported for the original charter school.(II) For an acquiring charter school, the counts shall be equal to the counts reported for the original charter school. This subclause shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, unless its operation is extended by the Legislature.(III) For the restructured portions of a divided charter school, the counts shall be zero.(IV) For the remaining portion of a divided charter school, the counts shall be equal to the counts reported for the original charter school.(ii) The definitions in Section 47654 apply for the purposes of this subparagraph.(6) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14002, the data used to determine the percentage of unduplicated pupils shall be final once that data is no longer used in the current fiscal year calculation of the percentage of unduplicated pupils. This paragraph does not apply to a change that is the result of an audit exception, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 41341.(c) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall annually calculate a local control funding formula grant for each school district and charter school in the state pursuant to this section.(d) The Superintendent shall compute a grade span adjusted base grant equal to the total of the following amounts:(1) (A) For the 2013–14 fiscal year, a base grant of:(i) Six thousand eight hundred forty-five dollars ($6,845) for average daily attendance in kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive.(ii) Six thousand nine hundred forty-seven dollars ($6,947) for average daily attendance in grades 4 to 6, inclusive.(iii) Seven thousand one hundred fifty-four dollars ($7,154) for average daily attendance in grades 7 and 8.(iv) Eight thousand two hundred eighty-nine dollars ($8,289) for average daily attendance in grades 9 to 12, inclusive.(B) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), commencing with the 2036–37 fiscal year, a base grant of:(I) Fourteen thousand eight hundred seventy-nine dollars ($14,879) for average daily attendance in kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive.(II) Fifteen thousand one hundred four dollars ($15,104) for average daily attendance in grades 4 to 6, inclusive.(III) Fifteen thousand five hundred fifty-one dollars ($15,551) for average daily attendance in grades 7 and 8.(IV) Eighteen thousand twenty-three dollars ($18,023) for average daily attendance in grades 9 to 12, inclusive.(ii) It is the intent of the Legislature to fully fund the local control funding formula target base grants in those years preceding the 2036–37 fiscal year and to spend those funds in the manner described in subdivision (b) of Section 42238.017.(2) In each year the grade span adjusted base grants in paragraph (1) shall be adjusted by the percentage change in the annual average value of the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services for the United States, as published by the United States Department of Commerce for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the prior fiscal year. This percentage change shall be determined using the latest data available as of May 10 of the preceding fiscal year compared with the annual average value of the same deflator for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the second preceding fiscal year, using the latest data available as of May 10 of the preceding fiscal year, as reported by the Department of Finance.(3) (A) The Superintendent shall compute an additional adjustment to the kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, base grant as adjusted pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (5) equal to 10.4 percent. The additional grant shall be calculated by multiplying the kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, base grant, as adjusted by paragraphs (2) and (5), by 10.4 percent.(B) Until paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.03 is effective, as a condition of the receipt of funds in this paragraph, a school district shall make progress toward maintaining an average class enrollment of not more than 24 pupils for each schoolsite in kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, unless a collectively bargained alternative annual average class enrollment for each schoolsite in those grades is agreed to by the school district, pursuant to the following calculation:(i) Determine a school district’s average class enrollment for each schoolsite for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, in the prior year. For the 2013–14 fiscal year, this amount shall be the average class enrollment for each schoolsite for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, in the 2012–13 fiscal year.(ii) Determine a school district’s proportion of total need pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.03.(iii) Determine the percentage of the need calculated in clause (ii) that is met by funding provided to the school district pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.03.(iv) Determine the difference between the amount computed pursuant to clause (i) and an average class enrollment of not more than 24 pupils.(v) Calculate a current year average class enrollment adjustment for each schoolsite for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, equal to the adjustment calculated in clause (iv) multiplied by the percentage determined pursuant to clause (iii).(C) School districts that have an average class enrollment for each schoolsite for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, of 24 pupils or less for each schoolsite in the 2012–13 fiscal year, shall be exempt from the requirements of subparagraph (B) so long as the school district continues to maintain an average class enrollment for each schoolsite for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, of not more than 24 pupils, unless a collectively bargained alternative ratio is agreed to by the school district.(D) (i) Upon full implementation of the local control funding formula, as a condition of the receipt of funds in this paragraph, all school districts shall maintain an average class enrollment for each schoolsite for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, of not more than 24 pupils for each schoolsite in kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, unless a collectively bargained alternative ratio is agreed to by the school district.(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), for purposes of meeting the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 48000, a school district shall maintain an average transitional kindergarten class enrollment of not more than 24 pupils for each schoolsite.(E) The average class enrollment requirement for each schoolsite for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, established pursuant to this paragraph shall not be subject to waiver by the state board pursuant to Section 33050 or by the Superintendent.(F) The Controller shall include the instructions necessary to enforce this paragraph in the audit guide required by Section 14502.1. The instructions shall include, but are not necessarily limited to, procedures for determining if the average class enrollment for each schoolsite for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, exceeds 24 pupils, or an alternative average class enrollment for each schoolsite pursuant to a collectively bargained alternative ratio. The procedures for determining average class enrollment for each schoolsite shall include criteria for employing sampling.(4) The Superintendent shall compute an additional adjustment to the base grant for grades 9 to 12, inclusive, as adjusted pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (5), equal to 2.6 percent. The additional grant shall be calculated by multiplying the base grant for grades 9 to 12, inclusive, as adjusted by paragraphs (2) and (5) by 2.6 percent.(5) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall increase the base grants for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, by 6.7 percent. This adjustment shall be calculated by multiplying the grade span-adjusted base grants calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) for the 2021–22 fiscal year by 6.7 percent. The adjustment shall be included in grade span-adjusted base grants grant amounts for purposes of the adjustment pursuant to paragraph (2) commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year.(e) The Superintendent shall compute a supplemental grant add-on equal to 20 percent of the base grants as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), as adjusted by paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (d), for each school district’s or charter school’s percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b). The supplemental grant shall be calculated by multiplying the base grants as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), as adjusted by paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (d), by 20 percent and by the percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in that school district or charter school. The supplemental grant shall be expended in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42238.07.(f) (1) (A) The Superintendent shall compute a concentration grant add-on equal to 50 percent of the base grants as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), as adjusted by paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (d), for each school district’s or charter school’s percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in excess of 55 percent of the school district’s or charter school’s total enrollment. The concentration grant shall be calculated by multiplying the base grants as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), as adjusted by paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (d), by 50 percent and by the percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in excess of 55 percent of the total enrollment in that school district or charter school.(B) Commencing with the 2021–22 fiscal year, the concentration grant add-on referenced in subparagraph (A) shall instead be equal to 65 percent of the base grants as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), as adjusted by paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (d), for each school district’s or charter school’s percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in excess of 55 percent of the school district’s or charter school’s total enrollment. The concentration grant shall be calculated by multiplying the base grants as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), as adjusted by paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (d), by 65 percent and by the percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in excess of 55 percent of the total enrollment in that school district or charter school.(2) (A) For a charter school physically located in only one school district, the percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in excess of 55 percent used to calculate concentration grants shall not exceed the percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in excess of 55 percent of the school district in which the charter school is physically located. For a charter school physically located in more than one school district, the charter school’s percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in excess of 55 percent used to calculate concentration grants shall not exceed that of the school district with the highest percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in excess of 55 percent of the school districts in which the charter school has a school facility. The concentration grant shall be expended in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42238.07.(B) For purposes of this paragraph and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 42238.03, a charter school shall report its physical location to the department under timeframes established by the department. For a charter school authorized by a school district, the department shall include the authorizing school district in the department’s determination of physical location. For a charter school authorized on appeal pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 47605, the department shall include the school district that initially denied the petition in the department’s determination of physical location. Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14002, the reported physical location of the charter school shall be considered final as of the second principal apportionment for that fiscal year, and, for purposes of this paragraph, the percentage of unduplicated pupils of the school district associated with the charter school pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be considered final as of the second principal apportionment for that fiscal year.(g) (1) The Superintendent shall compute an add-on to the total sum of a school district’s or charter school’s base, supplemental, and concentration grants equal to the amount of funding a school district or charter school received from funds allocated pursuant to the Targeted Instructional Improvement Block Grant program, as set forth in Article 6 (commencing with Section 41540) of Chapter 3.2, for the 2012–13 fiscal year, as that article read on January 1, 2013. A school district or charter school shall not receive a total funding amount from this add-on greater than the total amount of funding received by the school district or charter school from that program in the 2012–13 fiscal year. The amount computed pursuant to this subdivision shall reflect the reduction specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03.(2) (A) Notwithstanding Section 42238.05, for the 2022–23 to 2035–36 fiscal years, inclusive, the Superintendent shall compute an add-on to the total sum of a school district’s or charter school’s base, supplemental, and concentration grants equal to two thousand eight hundred thirteen dollars ($2,813) multiplied by the then current fiscal year’s second principal apportionment period average daily attendance in transitional kindergarten, as adjusted each fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (C).(B) Notwithstanding Section 42238.05, commencing with the 2036–37 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall compute an add-on to the total sum of a school district’s or charter school’s base, supplemental, and concentration grants equal to four thousand two hundred twenty dollars ($4,220) eight thousand three hundred eighteen dollars ($8,318) multiplied by the then current fiscal year’s second principal apportionment period average daily attendance in transitional kindergarten, as adjusted each fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (C).(C) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, the add-on computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), as applicable, shall be adjusted by the percentage change applied pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).(D) It is the intent of the Legislature that the costs to meet the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 48000 be supported by the add-on computed pursuant to this paragraph.(h) (1) The Superintendent shall compute an add-on to the total sum of a school district’s or charter school’s base, supplemental, and concentration grants equal to the amount of funding a school district or charter school received from funds allocated pursuant to the Home-to-School Transportation program, as set forth in former Article 2 (commencing with Section 39820) of Chapter 1 of Part 23.5, former Article 10 (commencing with Section 41850) of Chapter 5, and the Small School District Transportation program, as set forth in former Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 42290), as those articles read on January 1, 2013, for the 2012–13 fiscal year. A school district or charter school shall not receive a total funding amount from this add-on greater than the total amount received by the school district or charter school for those programs in the 2012–13 fiscal year. The amount computed pursuant to this subdivision shall reflect the reduction specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03.(2) If a home-to-school transportation joint powers agency, established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for purposes of providing pupil transportation, received an apportionment directly from the Superintendent from any of the funding sources specified in paragraph (1) for the 2012–13 fiscal year, the joint powers agency may identify the member local educational agencies and transfer entitlement to that funding to any of those member local educational agencies by reporting to the Superintendent, on or before September 30, 2015, the reassignment of a specified amount of the joint powers agency’s 2012–13 fiscal year entitlement to the member local educational agency. Commencing with the 2015–16 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall compute an add-on to the total sum of a school district’s or charter school’s base, supplemental, and concentration grants equal to the amount of the entitlement to funding transferred by the joint powers agency to the member school district or charter school.(3) Commencing in the 2023–24 fiscal year, the add-on amounts referenced in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall receive the annual cost-of-living adjustment specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).(i) (1) The sum of the local control funding formula rates computed pursuant to subdivisions (c) to (f), inclusive, shall be multiplied by:(A) For school districts, the average daily attendance of the school district in the corresponding grade level ranges computed pursuant to Section 42238.05, excluding the average daily attendance computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.05 for purposes of the computation specified in subdivision (d).(B) For charter schools, the total current year average daily attendance in the corresponding grade level ranges.(2) The amount computed pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 42280) shall be added to the amount computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (d), as multiplied by subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1), as appropriate.(j) The Superintendent shall adjust the sum of each school district’s or charter school’s amount determined in subdivisions (g) to (i), inclusive, pursuant to the calculation specified in Section 42238.03, less the sum of the following:(1) (A) For school districts, the property tax revenue received pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 75) and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) of Part 0.5 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(B) For charter schools, the in-lieu property tax amount provided to a charter school pursuant to Section 47635.(2) The amount, if any, received pursuant to Part 18.5 (commencing with Section 38101) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(3) The amount, if any, received pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16140) of Part 1 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(4) Prior years’ taxes and taxes on the unsecured roll.(5) Fifty percent of the amount received pursuant to Section 41603.(6) The amount, if any, received pursuant to the Community Redevelopment Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 33000) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code), less any amount received pursuant to Section 33401 or 33676 of the Health and Safety Code that is used for land acquisition, facility construction, reconstruction, or remodeling, or deferred maintenance and that is not an amount received pursuant to Section 33492.15, or paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 33607.5, or Section 33607.7 of the Health and Safety Code that is allocated exclusively for educational facilities.(7) The amount, if any, received pursuant to Sections 34177, 34179.5, 34179.6, 34183, and 34188 of the Health and Safety Code.(8) Revenue received pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.(k) A school district shall annually transfer to each of its charter schools funding in lieu of property taxes pursuant to Section 47635.(l) (1) This section does not authorize a school district that receives funding on behalf of a charter school pursuant to Section 47651 to redirect this funding for another purpose unless otherwise authorized in law pursuant to paragraph (2) or pursuant to an agreement between the charter school and its chartering authority.(2) A school district that received funding on behalf of a locally funded charter school in the 2012–13 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 42605, Section 42606, and subdivision (b) of Section 47634.1, as those sections read on January 1, 2013, or a school district that was required to pass through funding to a conversion charter school in the 2012–13 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 42606, as that section read on January 1, 2013, may annually redirect for another purpose a percentage of the amount of the funding received on behalf of that charter school. The percentage of funding that may be redirected shall be determined pursuant to the following computation:(A) (i) Determine the sum of the need fulfilled for that charter school pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.03 in the then current fiscal year for the charter school.(ii) Determine the sum of the need fulfilled in every fiscal year before the then current fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.03 adjusted for changes in average daily attendance pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03 for the charter school.(iii) Subtract the amount computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03 from the amount computed for that charter school under the local control funding formula entitlement computed pursuant to subdivision (i) of this section.(iv) Compute a percentage by dividing the sum of the amounts computed pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii) by the amount computed pursuant to clause (iii).(B) Multiply the percentage computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) by the amount of funding the school district received on behalf of the charter school in the 2012–13 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 42605, Section 42606, and subdivision (b) of Section 47634.1, as those sections read on January 1, 2013.(C) The maximum amount that may be redirected shall be the lesser of the amount of funding the school district received on behalf of the charter school in the 2012–13 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 42605, Section 42606, and subdivision (b) of Section 47634.1, as those sections read on January 1, 2013, or the amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (B).(3) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, a school district operating one or more affiliated charter schools shall provide each affiliated charter school schoolsite with no less than the amount of funding the schoolsite received pursuant to the charter school block grant in the 2012–13 fiscal year.(m) Any calculations in law that are used for purposes of determining if a local educational agency is an excess tax school entity or basic aid school district, including, but not limited to, this section and Sections 41544, 42238.03, 47632, 47660, 47663, 48310, and 48359.5, and Section 95 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall exclude the revenue received pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.(n) The funds apportioned pursuant to this section and Section 42238.03 shall be available to implement the activities required pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 52059.5) of Chapter 6.1 of Part 28 of Division 4.(o) A school district that does not receive an apportionment of state funds pursuant to this section, as implemented pursuant to Section 42238.03, excluding funds apportioned pursuant to the requirements of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 42238.03, shall be considered a “basic aid school district” or an “excess tax entity.”SEC. 4.SEC. 5. Section 42282 of the Education Code is amended to read:42282. (a) For the 2022–23 to 2035–36 fiscal years, inclusive, for each school district, on account of each necessary small school, as defined in Section 42283, the Superintendent shall make the following computations, as adjusted each fiscal year pursuant to Section 42287:(1) For each necessary small school that has an average daily attendance during the fiscal year of less than 25, excluding pupils attending the 7th and 8th grades of a junior high school, and for which school at least one teacher was hired full time, the Superintendent shall compute for the school district two hundred thirty-two thousand seven hundred dollars ($232,700).(2) For each necessary small school that has an average daily attendance during the fiscal year of 25 or more and less than 49, excluding pupils attending the 7th and 8th grades of a junior high school, and for which school at least two teachers were hired full time for more than one-half of the days schools were maintained, the Superintendent shall compute for the school district four hundred sixty thousand five hundred dollars ($460,500).(3) For each necessary small school that has an average daily attendance during the fiscal year of 49 or more, but less than 73, excluding pupils attending the 7th and 8th grades of a junior high school, and for which school three teachers were hired full time for more than one-half of the days schools were maintained, the Superintendent shall compute for the school district six hundred eighty-eight thousand five hundred dollars ($688,500).(4) For each necessary small school that has an average daily attendance during the fiscal year of 73 or more and less than 97, excluding pupils attending the 7th and 8th grades of a junior high school, and for which school four teachers were hired full time for more than one-half of the days schools were maintained, the Superintendent shall compute for the school district nine hundred sixteen thousand three hundred dollars ($916,300).(b) Commencing with the 2036–37 fiscal year, for each school district, on account of each necessary small school, as defined in Section 42283, the Superintendent shall make the following computations, as adjusted each fiscal year pursuant to Section 42287:(1) For each necessary small school that has an average daily attendance during the fiscal year of less than 25, excluding pupils attending the 7th and 8th grades of a junior high school, and for which school at least one teacher was hired full time, the Superintendent shall compute for the school district four hundred six thousand eight hundred twenty-nine dollars ($406,829).(2) For each necessary small school that has an average daily attendance during the fiscal year of 25 or more and less than 49, excluding pupils attending the 7th and 8th grades of a junior high school, and for which school at least two teachers were hired full time for more than one-half of the days schools were maintained, the Superintendent shall compute for the school district eight hundred five thousand ninety-one dollars ($805,091).(3) For each necessary small school that has an average daily attendance during the fiscal year of 49 or more, but less than 73, excluding pupils attending the 7th and 8th grades of a junior high school, and for which school three teachers were hired full time for more than one-half of the days schools were maintained, the Superintendent shall compute for the school district one million two hundred three thousand seven hundred four dollars ($1,203,704).(4) For each necessary small school that has an average daily attendance during the fiscal year of 73 or more and less than 97, excluding pupils attending the 7th and 8th grades of a junior high school, and for which school four teachers were hired full time for more than one-half of the days schools were maintained, the Superintendent shall compute for the school district one million six hundred one thousand nine hundred sixty-four dollars ($1,601,964).(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to fully fund the necessary small school targets in those years preceding the 2036–37 fiscal year and to spend those funds in the manner described in subdivision (b) of Section 42238.017.SEC. 5.SEC. 6. Section 42284 of the Education Code is amended to read:42284. (a) For the 2022–23 to 2035–36 fiscal years, inclusive, for each school district with fewer than 2,501 units of average daily attendance, on account of each necessary small high school, the Superintendent shall make one of the following computations selected with regard only to the number of certificated employees employed or average daily attendance, whichever provides the lesser amount, as adjusted each fiscal year pursuant to Section 42287: Average daily attendanceMinimum number of certificated employeesAmount to be computed per teacher   1–19 ........................ 1$196,100   1–19 ........................ 2$279,590   1–19 ........................ 3$621,060  20–38 ........................ 4$760,855  39–57 ........................ 5$900,650  58–71 ........................ 6$1,040,445  72–86 ........................ 7$1,180,240 87–100 ........................ 8$1,320,035101–114 ........................ 9$1,459,830115–129 ........................ 10$1,599,625130–143 ........................ 11$1,739,420144–171 ........................ 12$1,879,215172–210 ........................ 13$2,250,095211–248 ........................ 14$2,656,345249–286 ........................ 15$3,062,600(b) Commencing with the 2036–37 fiscal year and for each school district with fewer than 2,501 units of average daily attendance, on account of each necessary small high school, the Superintendent shall make one of the following computations selected with regard only to the number of certificated employees employed or average daily attendance, whichever provides the lesser amount, as adjusted each fiscal year pursuant to Section 42287: Average daily attendanceMinimum number of certificated employeesAmount to be computed per teacher   1–19 ........................ 1$339,212   1–19 ........................ 2$483,632   1–19 ........................ 3$1,074,303  20–38 ........................ 4$1,316,118  39–57 ........................ 5$1,557,935  58–71 ........................ 6$1,799,750  72–86 ........................ 7$2,041,566 87–100 ........................ 8$2,283,381101–114 ........................ 9$2,525,198115–129 ........................ 10$2,767,013130–143 ........................ 11$3,008,829144–171 ........................ 12$3,250,646172–210 ........................ 13$3,892,188211–248 ........................ 14$4,594,914249–286 ........................ 15$5,297,651(c) For purposes of this section, a “certificated employee” means an equivalent full-time position of an individual holding a credential authorizing service and providing service in any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, in any secondary school. Any fraction of an equivalent full-time position remaining after all equivalent full-time positions for certificated employees within the school district have been calculated shall be deemed to be a full-time position.(d) It is the intent of the Legislature to fully fund the necessary small school targets in those years preceding the 2036–37 fiscal year and to spend those funds in the manner described in subdivision (b) of Section 42238.017.